de: Flexibilitätsgrad der Finne: Mittel; Weich; Steif; Sonstige
nb: Fleksibilitetsrangering for finne: Middels; Myk; Stiv; Annet
lt-LT: Peleko lankstumo įvertinimas: Vidutinis; Minkštas; Standus; Kita
da: Finnefleksibilitetens klassificering: Medium; Blød; Stiv; Andet
el: Βαθμός ευκαμψίας πτερυγίου: Μέτρια; Μαλακή; Σκληρή; Άλλο
ro-RO: Indicele de flexibilitate al înotătoarei: Mediu; Moale; Rigid; Altele
pt-BR: Índice de flexibilidade da quilha: Média; Macia; Rígida; Outra
hr-HR: Ocjena fleksibilnosti peraje: Srednje; Meko; Kruto; Ostalo
ru: Рейтинг гибкости плавника: Средняя; Мягкая; Жесткая; Другое
sk-SK: Stupeň ohybnosti plutvy: Stredné; Mäkké; Tvrdé; Iné
bg-BG: Степен на гъвкавост на плавника: Средна; Мека; Твърда; Други
sv: Fena – flexibilitetsgrad: Medium; Mjuk; Styv; Övrigt
fr: Indice de flexibilité de la pointe: Moyen; Souple; Rigide; Autre
it: Valutazione della flessibilità della pinna: Medio; Morbido; Rigido; Altro
es: Calificación de la flexibilidad de aletas: Medio; Suave; Rígido; Otro
en: Fin flex rating: Medium; Soft; Stiff; Other
ko: 핀 유연성 등급: 중간; 부드러움; 뻣뻣함; 기타
tr: Fin esneklik derecesi: Orta; Yumuşak; Sert; Diğer
zh-CN: 鳍片柔韧度等级: 中等; 软; 硬; 其他
fi: Evän taipuisuustaso: Keskijäykkä; Pehmeä; Jäykkä; Muu
cs: Hodnocení pružnosti ploutve: Střední; Měkká; Tuhá; Jiné
hu: Uszony hajlékonysági besorolása: Közepes; Puha; Merev; Egyéb
th: ระดับความยืดหยุ่นของครีบ: ปานกลาง; อ่อน; แข็ง; อื่นๆ
ja: フィンストラップ定格: ミディアム; ソフト; ハード; その他
pt-PT: Índice de flexibilidade da quilha: Média; Macia; Rígida; Outro
pl: Ocena elastyczności płetwy: Średnia; Miękka; Sztywna; Inna
zh-TW: 蛙鞋彈性等級: 中等; 軟; 硬; 其他
sl-SI: Stopnja prožnosti plavuti: Srednja; Mehka; Trda; Drugo
nl: Flexibiliteitswaarde vin: Medium; Zacht; Stijf; Overig
vi: Độ cứng của vây: Trung bình; Mềm; Cứng; Khác